District of Columbia statutes.
29A-1012

Repealed

Registered agent as agent for service; service when no registered agent.

Repealed.

July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-138, § 13, 41 DCR 3010
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 1605(a), 49 DCR 11664
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(s), 58 DCR 1720
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1605(a) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1605(a) of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1605(a) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
1981 Ed., § 29-1312.
2001 Ed., § 29-1012.